Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-712.08
Records; federal government; exception.

If it is determined by any federal department or agency or other federal source of funds, services, or essential information, that any provision of sections 84-712, 84-712.01, 84-712.03 to 84-712.09, and 84-1413 would cause the denial of any funds, services, or essential information from the United States Government which would otherwise definitely be available to an agency of this state, such provision shall be suspended as to such agency, but only to the extent necessary to prevent denial of such funds, services, or essential information.

Laws 1979, LB 86, § 8.

Because the Legislature has expressed a strong public policy for disclosure, Nebraska courts must narrowly construe statutory exemptions shielding public records from disclosure. Evertson v. City of Kimball, 278 Neb. 1, 767 N.W.2d 751 (2009).

If a requesting party satisfies its prima facie claim for release of public records under section 84-712.03, the public body opposing disclosure must show by clear and convincing evidence that section 84-712.05 or this section exempts the records from disclosure. Evertson v. City of Kimball, 278 Neb. 1, 767 N.W.2d 751 (2009).